Maryland, session 2025, HB0998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–306.
(I) (1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF CALVERT COUNTY MAY GRANT, BY
LAW, A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE COUNTY PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON
REAL PROPERTY THAT WAS FORMERLY USED SOLELY AS A TOBACCO BARN IF THE
REAL PROPERTY:
(I) IS LOCATED ON LAND THAT IS SUBJECT TO A TOBACCO
BUYOUT AGREEMENT; OR
(II) 1. IS LOCATED ON LAND THAT QUALIFIES FOR AN
AGRICULTURAL USE ASSESSMENT; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0998*

HOUSE BILL 998
2. IS USED IN CONNECTION WITH AN ACTIVITY THAT IS
RECOGNIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT AS AN APPROVED AGRICULTURAL ACTIVITY.
(2) IN AUTHORIZING A CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY MAY PROVIDE, BY LAW, FOR:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT;
(II) THE DURATION OF THE CREDIT; AND
(III) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE
CREDIT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.